Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.100

Applications.

The applicant for a dentistry license shall file an application on a form furnished by the secretary, stating the applicant's name, age, place of residence, the name of the school or schools attended by the applicant, the period of such attendance, the date of the applicant's graduation, whether the applicant has ever been the subject of any disciplinary action related to the practice of dentistry, and shall include a statement of all of the applicant's dental activities. This shall include any other information deemed necessary by the commission.

The application shall be signed by the applicant and shall be accompanied by proof of the applicant's school attendance and graduation.

[ 2015 c 72 s 8; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 213; 1991 c 3 s 62; 1989 c 202 s 18; 1957 c 52 s 28; 1953 c 93 s 4; 1951 c 130 s 2; 1941 c 92 s 2; 1935 c 112 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10031-4, part. Prior: 1923 c 16 ss 2, 3, 6, 7; 1901 c 152 s 1; 1893 c 55 s 4.]